South Dakota, session 2026, SB231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 46A-1:
There is created the water infrastructure development fund. This fund consists of
moneys from appropriations of the Legislature, federal grants for projects on the Bureau
of Reclamation rural water projects list, interest on investments, and principal and interest
on loans made from the fund. Expenditures from the fund are continuously appropriated
and must be used for the construction, planning, and development of rural water projects
in the state.
The Board of Water and Natural Resources may award a grant from the fund. A
grant under this section may not exceed ten percent of the construction cost, as estimated
by the board. The board may also provide a loan for a project, provided the loan does not
exceed fifty percent of the construction cost, as estimated by the board.
The board, in rulemaking pursuant to chapter 1-26, shall establish criteria for the
selection of water projects to receive loans or grants from the fund and for the terms,
conditions, and administration of the loans and grants.
Section 2. The state treasurer shall transfer $3,000,000 from the general fund to the water
infrastructure development fund, created in section 1 of this Act.
Section 3. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.

26.966.19 2 231
An Act to create the water infrastructure development fund, to provide an appropriation, to
provide for the awarding of grants and loans from the fund for certain rural water projects
and to declare an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 231
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 231 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB231 ENROLLED